Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 3. Alaska Children’s Trust.

Sec. 37.14.200.
Alaska children’s trust established.

The Alaska children’s trust is established as a separate endowment trust of the state.

The trust consists of

legislative appropriations to the trust;

donations to the trust; and

income earned on investments of trust assets appropriated by the legislature to the trust.

The commissioner of revenue shall manage the trust as an endowment, with the goal that the purchasing power of the trust will not diminish over time without regard to additional contributions that may be made to the trust. The commissioner shall invest the assets of the trust in a manner likely to yield at least a five percent real rate of return over time. The commissioner may commingle the assets of the trust with other public funds for purposes of investment.

In carrying out the investment duties under AS

37.14.200

—

37.14.270

, the commissioner of revenue has the powers and duties set out in AS

37.10.071

. The commissioner shall provide reports to the board on the condition and investment performance of the trust.

As soon as is practicable after July 1 of each year, the commissioner of revenue shall determine the average of the market values of the trust on June 30 for the immediately preceding three fiscal years. The commissioner shall identify five percent of that amount as available for appropriation to the grant account from which the board may award grants under AS

37.14.230

. The commissioner shall also report as available for appropriation a total of amounts previously identified as available for appropriation to the grant account that have not been appropriated.

The legislature may appropriate from the principal of the trust up to $150,000 each year for the administrative expenses of the board relating to AS

37.14.200

—

37.14.270

. The legislature may also appropriate from the principal of the trust expenses related to the commissioner of revenue’s management of trust assets.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 19 SLA 1988; am E.O. No. 96 § 3 (1996); am §§ 5 — 7 ch 115 SLA 2010)

Sec. 37.14.205.
Alaska children’s trust grant account.

The Alaska children’s trust grant account is established as an account in the general fund. The legislature may appropriate funds to the grant account from

the trust account in the amount described in AS

37.14.200(e)

;

program receipts from special request Alaska children’s trust plates under AS

28.10.421(d)(14)

;

program receipts from birth certificates under AS

18.50.225

;

program receipts from certificates of marriage under AS

18.50.272

;

private restricted-use donations; and

any other source.

The board may use money in the grant account for the following purposes and without further appropriation:

to make grants under AS

37.14.230

;

to obtain private and federal grants for the trust and the grant account;

to solicit contributions, gifts, and bequests for the trust and the grant account;

to expend private restricted-use donations in conformity with the donor’s restrictions.

History.

(§ 8 ch 115 SLA 2010)

Sec. 37.14.210.
Powers and duties of the commissioner of revenue. [Repealed, § 14 ch 115 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 37.14.220.
Administration of the trust.

The trust shall be administered by the Alaska Children’s Trust Board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 19 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 84 § 2 (1993); am E.O. No. 96 § 5 (1996))

Sec. 37.14.225.
Trust board established.

The Alaska Children’s Trust Board is established in the Office of the Governor. The board is composed of

the governor or a designee of the governor;

the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee;

the commissioner of education and early development or the commissioner’s designee; and

four public members appointed by the governor who have experience and expertise in

children’s or prevention programs, including child abuse and neglect prevention programs; or

private sector finance.

History.

(E.O. No. 96 § 6 (1996); am § 9 ch 115 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” in this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 37.14.230.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall

hold regular and special meetings it considers necessary; the board may hold meetings by teleconference;

award grants from the grant account to community-based programs that the board finds will aid in the prevention of child abuse and neglect;

monitor approved programs for compliance with AS

37.14.200

—

37.14.270

and specified grant conditions;

maintain records for all donations to the trust and the grant account; the records must reflect the amount of the donation, the date of the donation, the donor’s intent, if any, with respect to how the donation is to be used, the account into which the donation was deposited, and the manner in which the donation was expended;

apply for and use funds from the grant account to obtain private and federal grants for the prevention of child abuse and neglect;

solicit contributions, gifts, and bequests to the trust and the grant account;

keep electronic recordings of each meeting of the board to be made available on request;

submit to the governor and make available to the legislature by February 1 each year a report describing

the child abuse and neglect prevention services that were provided by the programs to which the board awarded grants; and

the annual level of contributions, income, and expenses of the trust and the grant account;

make arrangements with the commissioner or a financial depository to manage private restricted-use donations that are not fully expended and account for any interest earned on the donations.

The board may enter into joint arrangements with a private nonprofit entity or entities for the purpose of making grants and fundraising for the support of child abuse and neglect prevention programs. In entering into a joint arrangement, the board may not delegate its duties or authority under AS

37.14.200

—

37.14.270

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 19 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 16 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 84 § 3 (1993); am § 63 ch 21 SLA 1995; am E.O. No. 96 § 7 (1996); am §§ 10, 11 ch 115 SLA 2010)

Sec. 37.14.240.
Fund utilization. [Repealed, § 14 ch 115 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 37.14.245.
Regulations.

The board may adopt regulations to implement AS

37.14.200

—

37.14.270

. Regulations adopted by the board are not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). The board shall comply with the requirements of AS

44.62.310

and

44.62.312

.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a regulation adopted under AS

37.14.200

—

37.14.270

shall be published in the Alaska Administrative Register and Alaska Administrative Code for informational purposes. A regulation adopted under this section shall conform to the style and format requirements of the drafting manual for administrative regulations that is published under AS

44.62.050

.

At least 30 days before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation under this section, the board shall provide notice of the action that is being considered. The notice must include publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the state.

A regulation adopted under this section takes effect 30 days after adoption by the board unless a later effective date is stated in the regulation.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a regulation may be adopted, amended, or repealed, effective immediately, as an emergency regulation. For an emergency regulation to be effective, the board must find that the immediate adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation is necessary. The board shall, within 10 days after adoption of an emergency regulation, give notice of the adoption under (c) of this section. An emergency regulation adopted under this subsection may not remain in effect past the date of the next regular meeting of the board unless the board complies with the procedures set out in this section and adopts the regulation as a permanent regulation.

In this section, “regulation” has the meaning given in AS

44.62.640(a)

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 115 SLA 2010)

Secs. 37.14.250 — 37.14.260.
Grants; eligibility for grants. [Repealed, § 14 ch 115 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 37.14.270.
Definitions.

In AS

37.14.200

—

37.14.270

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“board” means the Alaska Children’s Trust Board;

“grant account” means the Alaska children’s trust grant account established in AS

37.14.205

;

“private restricted-use donation” means a donation related to the prevention of child abuse and neglect where a donor specifies in writing that the donation be used for any purpose other than to be placed in the corpus of the trust and invested with trust assets;

“trust” means the Alaska children’s trust established in AS

37.14.200

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 19 SLA 1988; am §§ 8, 18 ch 16 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 84 § 5 (1993); am E.O. No. 96 §§ 17, 18 (1996); am § 23 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 13 ch 115 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former paragraph (3) was enacted as (5). Renumbered in 1990, at which time (3) and (4) were renumbered as former (4) and (5) respectively.

Reorganized in 1996 to reflect the 1990 repeal of former paragraph (1), the 1996 repeal of former paragraphs (3) and (4), and the 1996 addition of paragraphs (1) and (4).